New Jersey, session 222, S800.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  As used in this section, urine drug screening means a chemical analysis intended to test a patient for the presence of multiple drugs, including, but not limited to, cocaine, opioids, and phencyclidine. b.    A general acute care hospital licensed pursuant to P.L.1971, c.136, (C.26:2H-1 et al.) that conducts a urine drug screening to assist in diagnosing a patients condition shall include, in the urine drug screening, a test for the presence of fentanyl. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall expire on January 1, 2028.